Mississippi, session 2026, HB4161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Montana Wimberly of Lincoln County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her convictions for Worthless Checks in Pike County, Mississippi, for which she was sentenced to serve five (5) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  She was released on probation on May 6, 2014. On June 9, 2014, she was sentenced for the crime of False Pretenses in Lincoln County to serve five (5) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On June 9, 2014, she was sentenced for the crime of Worthless Checks in Lincoln County to serve three (3) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, with charges to run concurrently. She was released from probation on February 28, 2018.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.